Montana, session 2025, HB708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 61-5-123, MCA, is amended to read:
"61-5-123. Waiver of skills test or knowledge test related to military commercial motor vehicles
experience -- definition. (1) As used in this section, "current or former military service member" means a
person:
(a) honorably discharged from the armed forces of the United States;
(b) currently serving in the armed forces of the United States;
(c) serving full-time in a reserve component, as defined in 37-1-138; or
(d) honorably discharged from the reserve component after serving full-time in the reserve
component.
(2) The department may waive the skills test, knowledge test, or both, required for a commercial
driver's license if an applicant is a current or former military service member and meets the conditions in
subsection (3), (4), or (5).
(3) A current or former military service member applying for waiver of the skills test shall:
(a) certify and provide evidence that the member:
(i) is or was regularly employed within the last year in a military position requiring operation of a
commercial motor vehicle;
(ii) was exempted from the commercial driver's license requirements in 61-8-803; and
(iii) was operating, for at least 2 years immediately preceding separation from the military, a vehicle
representative of the commercial motor vehicle type the driver applicant operates or expects to operate; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 708
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 708
(b) certify that during the 2-year period immediately prior to applying for a commercial driver's
license, the member:
(i) has not simultaneously held more than one civilian license;
(ii) has not had any license suspended, revoked, or cancelled;
(iii) has not had any convictions for any type of motor vehicle for the disqualifying offenses
contained in 61-8-802;
(iv) has not had any convictions for a violation of federal, military, state, or local law relating to
motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with any traffic accident; and
(v) has no record of an accident in which the current or former military service member was at
fault.
(4) A current or former military service member applying for waiver of the knowledge test shall
certify and provide evidence that during the 1-year period immediately prior to the application, the member:
(a) is or was regularly employed and designated as a:
(i) motor transport operator--88M (Army);
(ii) PATRIOT launching station operator--14T (Army);
(iii) fueler--92F (Army);
(iv) vehicle operator--2T1 (Air Force);
(v) fueler--2F0 (Air Force);
(vi) pavement and construction equipment operator--3E2 (Air Force);
(vii) motor vehicle operator--3531 (Marine Corps); or
(viii) equipment operator--E.O. (Navy);
(b) is operating a vehicle representative of the commercial motor vehicle type the driver applicant
expects to operate on separation from the military or operated a similar vehicle type immediately preceding
separation from the military;
(c) has not simultaneously held more than one civilian license;
(d) has not had any license suspended, revoked, or cancelled;
(e) has not had any convictions for any type of motor vehicle for the disqualifying offenses
contained in 61-8-802;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 708
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 708
(f) has not had more than one conviction for any type of motor vehicle for serious traffic violations
contained in 61-8-803;
(g) has not had any convictions for a violation of federal, military, state, or local law relating to
motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with any traffic accident; and
(h) has no record of an accident in which the current or former military service member was at
fault.
(5) A current or former military service member applying for waiver of the applicable skills and
knowledge tests for a passenger, tank vehicle, or hazardous materials endorsement shall certify and provide
evidence that during the 1-year period immediately prior to the application, the member:
(a) is or was regularly employed in a military position requiring:
(i) operation of a passenger commercial motor vehicle if requesting waiver of the skills and
knowledge test for a passenger endorsement;
(ii) operation of a tank vehicle if requesting waiver of the skills and knowledge test for a tank
vehicle endorsement; or
(iii) transportation of hazardous materials if requesting waiver of the skills and knowledge test for a
hazardous materials endorsement;
(b) has not simultaneously held more than one civilian license;
(c) has not had any convictions for any type of motor vehicle for the disqualifying offenses
contained in 61-8-802;
(d) has not had more than one conviction for any type of motor vehicle for serious traffic violations
contained in 61-8-803;
(e) has not had any convictions for a violation of federal, military, state, or local law relating to
motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with any traffic accident; and
(f) has no record of an accident in which the current or former military service member was at
fault."
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 708
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 708, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 708
INTRODUCED BY G. NIKOLAKAKOS, B. BARKER
AN ACT ALLOWING ALL PERSONS SERVING IN A RESERVE COMPONENT TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR CERTAIN
COMMERCIAL DRIVER'S LICENSE WAIVERS; AND AMENDING SECTION 61-5-123, MCA.”